en: fortified
es: fortificado, fortificada, fortificados, fortificadas
fr: fortifié, fortifiée, fortifiés, fortifiées
it: fortificato, fortificata, fortificati, fortificate
pt: fortificado, fortificada, fortificados, fortificadas
uk: збагачений, збагачена, збагачене, збагачені

en: thickened
de: eingedickte
fr: épaissi

en: bromated
de: bromiert, bromierte, bromiertes
es: bromado
fr: bromé, bromée, bromés, bromées
it: bromato, bromata, bromati, bromate
nl: gebromeerd
pt: bromado
uk: бромований, бромована, бромоване, бромовані

en: unbromated, un-bromated
ca: sense bromat
es: sin bromato
fr: sans bromate
it: senza bromato
pt: sem bromato
ro: nebromatizat

en: covered, coated
ca: cobertura
es: cobertura
pt: coberto, coberta, cobertos, cobertas, cobertura, coberturas, coberto com, coberta com, cobertos com, cobertas com, cobertura em, coberturas em

en: mixture, mixtures
ca: barreja, barreja de
es: mezcla, mezcla de
hr: mješavina, miješano, melanž od, mješavina za
it: miscela, misto, mix
pl: mieszanka, mieszanki
uk: суміш, суміш з, суміші, суміші з

en: salted
ca: salat, salada, salats, salades
de: gesalzen, gesalzene, gesalzenes, gesalzener
es: salado, salada, salados, saladas
fi: suolattu
fr: salé, salée, salés, salées, sales, salees
hu: sózott
it: salato, salata, salate, salati
nl: gezouten
pl: solony, solona, solone, solonego, solonej, solonych, słony, słone, słona
pt: salgado, salgada, salgados, salgadas, com sal
sv: saltad, saltat, saltade
uk: солоний, солона, солоне, солоні, солений, солена, солене, солені, засолений, засолена, засолене, засолені

en: sea salted
de: mit Meersalz, mit Meer Salz, mit Meersalzen
es: con sal marina, con sal del mar, salado con sal marina, salada con sal marina, salados con sal marina, saladas con sal marina
fr: salé au sel de mer, salée au sel de mer, salés au sel de mer, salées au sel de mer
it: con sale marino, salato con sale marino, salata con sale marino, salati con sale marino, salate con sale marino, salato con sale di mare, salata con sale di mare, salati con sale di mare, salate con sale di mare
nl: met zeezout, met zee zout
pt: com sal marinho, sem sal marinho

en: lightly salted
de: leicht gesalzen, leicht gesalzene, leicht gesalzener, leicht gesalzenes
es: ligeramente salado, ligeramente salada, ligeramente salados, ligeramente saladas
fr: légèrement salé, légèrement salée, légèrement salés, légèrement salées
it: leggermente salato, leggeremente salata, leggeremente salati, leggeremente salate
nl: lichtgezouten, licht gezouten
pl: lekko solone
pt: levemente salgado, levemente salgada, levemente salgados, levemente salgadas, com pouco sal
sv: lättsaltad, lättsaltat, lättsaltade

en: half salted, half-salted
ca: mitja sal, mitja-sal
de: halb gesalzen, halb-gesalzen
es: mitad salado, mitad-salado
fr: mi-salé, mi-salée
it: mezzo salato, mezza salata
nl: halfgezouten, half-gezouten
pt: com meio-sal

en: desalted
bg: обезсолено, обезсолен, обезсолена, обезсолени
fr: dessalée, dessalee
sv: avsaltad, avsaltat, avsaltade

fr: présalée
it: presalato, presalata, presalati, presalate
pt: pré-salgado, pré-salgada, pré-salgados, pré-salgadas

en: unsalted, un-salted
ca: sense sal
de: ungesalzen, ungesalzene
es: sin sal
fr: non salé, non salée, non salés, non salées
it: senza sale, non salato
nl: ongezouten
pl: bez soli, niesolone
pt: sem sal, não salgado
ro: nesărat
sv: osaltad, osaltat, osaltade
uk: несолений, несолена, несолене, несолені, несолоний, несолона, несолоне, несолоні

en: sweetened
bg: подсладено, подсладен, подсладена, подсладени
ca: dolc de
cs: slazené
da: sødet
de: gesüßt, gesüßte
el: ζαχαρούχο
es: endulzado, endulzada, endulzados, endulzadas, dulce de
et: magustatud
fi: makeutettu, makeutetut
fr: sucré, sucrée, sucrés, sucrées, sucree, sucrees
hr: zaslađene, zaslađeno, zasladeno
hu: édesített
it: addolcito, addolciti, addolcita, addolcite
lt: saldintas
lv: saldināts, saldinats
nb: søt
nl: gezoet, gezoete
pl: słodzony, słodzona, słodzone, słodzonych, słodzonej, słodzonego
pt: adoçado, adoçada, adoçados, adoçadas, adocicado, adocicada, adocicados, adocicadas
ro: indulcit, îndulcite
sl: sladkano
sv: sötad, söt, sötade
th: หวาน
uk: підсолоджений, підсолоджена, підсолоджене, підсолоджені

en: concentrate for sweetening
hr: koncentrat za zaslađivanje

en: sugared, with sugar
bg: захаросано, захаросан, захаросана, захаросани
ca: ensucrada, amb sucre
da: sukret, med sukker
de: gezuckert, gezuckerte, gezuckerter, gezuckertes
es: azucarado, azucarada, azucarados, azucaradas
fi: sokeroitu, sokeroidut, sokeroitua, sokeroituja
hu: cukrozott
it: zuccherato, zuccherati, zuccherata, zuccherate
ja: 加糖
nb: sukret, sukkerholdig
nl: gesuikerd, gesuikerde, met suiker
pt: açucarado, açucarada, açucarados, açucaradas
ru: с сахаром
sv: sockrad, sockrat, sockrade

en: unsweetened
de: ungesüßt, ungesüßte, ungesüßter, ungesüßtes
fr: non sucré, non sucrée, non sucrés, non sucrées
it: non zuccherato, non zuccherati, senza zucchero aggiunto, senza zuccheri aggiunti
nl: ongezoet
pl: niesłodzony, niesłodzona, niesłodzone
pt: não adoçado, não adoçada, não adoçados, não adoçadas, não adocicado, não adocicada, não adocicados, não adocicadas, não açucarado, não açucarada, não açucarados, não açucaradas, sem açúcar, sem açúcares
sv: osötad, osötat, osötade

de: leicht gezuckert, leicht gezuckerte, leicht gezuckerter, leicht gezuckertes
es: ligeramente azucarado, ligeramente azucarada, ligeramente azucarados, ligeramente azucaradas
fr: légèrement sucré, légèrement sucrée, légèrement sucrés, légèrement sucrées
it: leggermente zuccherato, leggermente zuccherata, leggermente zuccherati, leggermente zuccherate
nl: licht gezoet, licht gezoete, licht gezoeter, licht gezoet
pt: levemente açucarado, levemente açucarada, levemente açucarados, levemente açucaradas

en: candied
ca: confitat, confitada
da: kandiserede
de: kandiert, kandierte, kandierten, kandierter
es: confitado, confitada, confitados, confitadas
fr: confit, confite, confits, confites, confit de, confit d'
hr: kandirana, kandirane, kandiranog
hu: kandírozott, konfitált
it: candito, candita, canditi, candite
ja: 甘露煮
nl: gekonfijt, gekonfijte
pl: kandyzowany, kandyzowana, kandyzowane, kandyzowanych, kandyzowanego, kandyzowanej
pt: confitado, confitada, confitados, confitadas
sv: kanderad, kanderat, kanderade

en: semi candied, semi-candied
de: halb kandiert, halb kandierte, halb kandierter, halb kandiertes
es: semi confitado, semi confitada, semi confitados, semi confitadas
fr: semi-confit, semi confit
it: semi candito, semi candita, semi canditi, semi candite
nl: half gekonfijt, half gekonfijte
pt: semi confitado, semi confitada, semi confitados, semi confitadas
ro: semi confiat, semi confiata, semi confiați, semi confiate
sv: halv kanderad, halv kanderade, halv kanderade, halv kanderade